Oklahoma, session 2025, SB10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 930.12 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any person receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Public Employees


Retirement System as of June 30, 2025, who continues to receive


benefits on or after the effective date of this act, shall receive a


five percent (5%) increase in benefits.




60-1-109 RD 12/6/2024 9:56:30 AM









Req. No. 109 Page 1